Tennessee, session 114, HB0965.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Title 50, Chapter 11, is amended by adding
the following new section:
(a) As used in this section, "state construction contracts" means state contracts
for the construction, reconstruction, improvement, rehabilitation, installation, alteration,
renovation, demolition of, or otherwise providing for, any building, facility, or physical
structure in this state with a minimum value of one million dollars ($1,000,000).
(b) A state agency submitting requests for proposals for state construction
contracts is encouraged to include the following provision in the request:
Will you, other contractors, subcontractors, or anyone else employed to
work on any stage of this construction project be employing apprentices
on the project pursuant to a certified or registered apprenticeship program
in accordance with Tennessee Code Annotated, Title 50, Chapter 11?
(c) A contractor, subcontractor, or other person employed to work at any stage
of a state construction project pursuant to a state construction contract is encouraged to
employ apprentices on the project pursuant to a certified or registered apprenticeship
program in accordance with this chapter.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect November 1, 2026, the public welfare requiring it.
HB0965
002549
- 1 -